California, session 20252026, AB798.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Diapers are essential for the health and well-being of babies and toddlers, yet one in two families in the United States struggles to afford diapers.(b) A lack of diapers is not only a public health issue, but also an obstacle to economic mobility for low-income families.(c) Diapers alone can cost approximately $100 or more per month per child, or approximately 4 percent or more of a person’s total income if they are making California minimum wage, with low-income families disproportionately experiencing the burden.(d) One in four parents or caregivers who rely on childcare services and who do not have enough diapers often cannot drop their children off at childcare, leading to missed days at work and school, missed early education opportunities for toddlers, and an increased likelihood of painful rashes and infections.(e) The benefit programs CalFresh and the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC Program) do not provide diaper aid.(f) In April 2018, the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program began providing diaper aid as a supportive service, to a person participating in a welfare-to-work plan, in the amount of $30 per month for each child within a certain age range.(g) Diapers are the fourth greatest cost burden for many families.(h) According to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection (CAL FIRE), California’s nine largest wildfires have occurred within the last decade. Two of the most destructive fires, categorized by structures destroyed, include the 2025 Palisades and Eaton fires. Furthermore, California’s Fourth Climate Change Assessment notes that, by 2100, the frequency of extreme wildfires burning over approximately 25,000 acres could increase by nearly 50 percent.(i) Expanding the geographic reach of the state’s diaper distribution efforts will address diaper need in California, especially for vulnerable families, while leveraging and strengthening existing safety-net investments.SEC. 2. Section 18995.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18995.1. (a) (1) Subject to an appropriation for this purpose, the State Department of Social Services shall administer the State Emergency Food Bank Reserve Program to provide food, children’s diapers, wipes, and funding for the provision of emergency food, children’s diapers, wipes, and related costs to food banks serving low-income Californians to prevent hunger during natural or human-made disasters.(2) For purposes of this chapter, “food banks” means participating providers operating in California under the federal Emergency Food Assistance Program (Parts 250 and 251 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations), or the federal Commodity Supplemental Food Program (Parts 247 and 250 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations), members of the nonprofit organization Feeding America that are based in California, and members of the California Association of Food Banks.(b) Upon a proclamation or declaration of a disaster or state of emergency by the governing body of a county, city, or city and county, or by an official designated by ordinance adopted by that governing body, the state, or the federal government, the department may distribute funds for the purposes set forth in subdivision (c). The department shall determine the best method for distribution to ensure that the funds are used for the purposes specified in this chapter.(c) Funds distributed pursuant to this chapter may be used for all of the following purposes:(1) To purchase and distribute food in eligible communities.(2) To reimburse food banks for food and the costs associated with the procurement and distribution of food in eligible communities.(3) To purchase and distribute children’s diapers and wipes in eligible communities.(4) To reimburse food banks for children’s diapers and wipes and the costs associated with the procurement and distribution of children’s diapers and wipes in eligible communities.(d) Notwithstanding any other law, agreements awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter by means of letter or similar instructions without taking any regulatory action.(f) The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter is a state law that provides assistance and services for undocumented persons within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.